Massachusetts, session 194th, H388.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 81 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Any seller of health club services whose website allows for the purchase or adjustment of
a contract for health club services through the website including, but not limited to, purchasing
additional services, programs and benefits or removing services, programs and benefits, shall
provide a method of cancellation of such contracts on the seller’s website.
of 1